Washington statutes.
RCW 36.40.205

Salary adjustment for county legislative authority office—Ratification and validation of preelection action.

If prior to the election for any county legislative authority office, a salary adjustment for such position to become effective upon the commencement of the term next following such election is adopted by ordinance or resolution of the legislative authority of such county, and a salary adjustment coinciding with such preceding ordinance or resolution thereof is properly adopted as part of the county budget for the years following such election, such action shall be deemed a continuing part of and shall ratify and validate the preelection action as to such salary adjustment.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 32 s 1.]